California, session 20252026, SB1235.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 19813 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:19813. (a) Of the members initially appointed, two shall be appointed for a term of two years, two shall be appointed for a term of three years, and one shall be appointed for a term of four years. After the initial terms, the The term of office of each member of the commission is four years.(b) The Governor shall appoint the members of the commission, subject to confirmation by the Senate, and shall designate one member to serve as chairperson. The initial appointments shall be made within three months of the operative date of this section. Thereafter, vacancies Vacancies shall be filled within 60 days of the date of the vacancy by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate.(c) The Governor may remove any a member of the commission for incompetence, neglect of duty, or corruption upon first giving him or her the member a copy of the charges and an opportunity to be heard. The Governor shall notify the Senate and Assembly Committees on Governmental Organization of the removal of a member of the commission.